District of Columbia statutes.
8-2004

Identification card.

(a)

The owner, operator, or custodian of a horse engaged in the horse-drawn carriage trade shall have available for immediate inspection by the Mayor or his or her designee, a police officer, or an animal control officer at all times when a horse is on any street or public byway in the District, an identification card as defined in § 8-2001(9).

(b)

In an instance where the owner rents, hires, or places the horse in the care or custody of another person, he or she shall provide that person with the identification card required by subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

The Mayor shall certify the identification card following an examination of the horse by a licensed veterinarian.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-224, § 5, 38 DCR 207
1981 Ed., § 6-1034.
This section is referenced in § 8-2003.